csv2yaml/yaml_output/VTA_Cnj_aw.yaml
     mikaw+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Dub+1Sg+3SgProx: mikawaasiwaawagen
     mikaw+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Dub+1Sg+3SgProx: mikawaawagen
     mikaw+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Dub+2Pl+3SgProx: mikawaasiwaawegwen
     mikaw+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Dub+2Pl+3SgProx: mikawaawegwen
     mikaw+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Dub+2Sg+3SgProx: mikawaasiwaawaden
     mikaw+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Dub+2Sg+3SgProx: mikawaawaden
     mikaw+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Dub+3SgObv/3PlObv+3SgProx: mikaagosiigwen
     mikaw+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Dub+3SgObv/3PlObv+3SgProx: mikaagogwen
     mikaw+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Dub+Excl+3SgProx: mikawaasiwaawangiden
     mikaw+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Dub+Excl+3SgProx: mikawaawangiden
     mikaw+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Dub+Incl+3SgProx: mikawaasiwaawangen
     mikaw+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Dub+Incl+3SgProx: mikawaawangen
     mikaw+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Dub+X+3SgProx: mikawaasiwaawinden
     mikaw+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Dub+X+3SgProx: mikawaawinden
     mikaw+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Neu+0Sg/0Pl+3SgProx: mikaagosig
     mikaw+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+0Sg/0Pl+3SgProx: mikaagod
     mikaw+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Neu+1Sg+3SgProx: mikawaasiwag
     mikaw+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+1Sg+3SgProx: mikawag
     mikaw+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Neu+2Pl+3SgProx: mikawaasiweg
     mikaw+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+2Pl+3SgProx: mikaweg
     mikaw+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Neu+2Sg+3SgProx: mikawaasiwad
     mikaw+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+2Sg+3SgProx: mikawad
     mikaw+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Neu+3SgObv/3PlObv+3SgProx: mikaagosig
     mikaw+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3SgObv/3PlObv+3SgProx: mikaagod
     mikaw+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Neu+Excl+3SgProx: mikawaasiwangid
     mikaw+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+Excl+3SgProx: mikawangid
     mikaw+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Neu+Incl+3SgProx: mikawaasiwang
     mikaw+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+Incl+3SgProx: mikawang
     mikaw+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Neu+X+3SgProx: mikawaasiwind
     mikaw+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+X+3SgProx: mikawind
     mikaw+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Prt+0Sg/0Pl+3SgProx: mikaagosigoban
     mikaw+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Prt+0Sg/0Pl+3SgProx: mikaagopan
     mikaw+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Prt+1Sg+3SgProx: mikawaasiwagiban
     mikaw+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Prt+1Sg+3SgProx: mikawagiban
     mikaw+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Prt+2Pl+3SgProx: mikawaasiwegiban
     mikaw+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Prt+2Pl+3SgProx: mikawegiban
     mikaw+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Prt+2Sg+3SgProx: mikawaasiwadiban
     mikaw+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Prt+2Sg+3SgProx: mikawadiban
     mikaw+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Prt+3SgObv/3PlObv+3SgProx: mikaagosigoban
     mikaw+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Prt+3SgObv/3PlObv+3SgProx: mikaagopan
     mikaw+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Prt+Excl+3SgProx: mikawangidiban
     mikaw+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Prt+Excl+3SgProx: mikawangidiban
     mikaw+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Prt+Incl+3SgProx: mikawaasiwangiban
     mikaw+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Prt+Incl+3SgProx: mikawangiban
     mikaw+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Prt+X+3SgProx: mikawaasiwindiban
     mikaw+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Prt+X+3SgProx: mikawindiban
     mikaw+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Dub+0Sg/0Pl+Excl: mikaagosiiwaangen
     mikaw+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Dub+0Sg/0Pl+Excl: mikaagowaangen
     mikaw+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Dub+2Pl+Excl: mikawisiiwaangen
     mikaw+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Dub+2Pl+Excl: mikawiwaangen
     mikaw+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Dub+2Sg+Excl: mikawisiiwaangen
     mikaw+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Dub+2Sg+Excl: mikawiwaangen
     mikaw+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Dub+3PlProx+Excl: mikawisiiwangidwaawen
     mikaw+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Dub+3PlProx+Excl: mikawiwangidwaawen
     mikaw+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Dub+3SgProx+Excl: mikawisiiwangiden
     mikaw+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Dub+3SgProx+Excl: mikawiwangiden
     mikaw+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Dub+X+Excl: mikaagoosiiwaangen
     mikaw+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Dub+X+Excl: mikaagoowaangen
     mikaw+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Neu+0Sg/0Pl+Excl: mikaagosiwaang
     mikaw+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+0Sg/0Pl+Excl: mikaagoyaang
     mikaw+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Neu+2Pl+Excl: mikawisiwaang
     mikaw+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+2Pl+Excl: mikawiyaang
     mikaw+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Neu+2Sg+Excl: mikawisiwaang
     mikaw+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+2Sg+Excl: mikawiyaang
     mikaw+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Neu+3PlProx+Excl: mikawisiwangidwaa
     mikaw+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3PlProx+Excl: mikawiyangidwaa
     mikaw+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Neu+3SgProx+Excl: mikawisiwangid
     mikaw+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3SgProx+Excl: mikawiyangid
     mikaw+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Neu+X+Excl: mikaagoosiwaang
     mikaw+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+X+Excl: mikaagooyaang
     mikaw+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Prt+0Sg/0Pl+Excl: mikaagosiwaangiban
     mikaw+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Prt+0Sg/0Pl+Excl: mikaagoyaangiban
     mikaw+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Prt+2Pl+Excl: mikawisiwaangiban
     mikaw+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Prt+2Pl+Excl: mikawiyaangiban
     mikaw+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Prt+2Sg+Excl: mikawisiwaangiban
     mikaw+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Prt+2Sg+Excl: mikawiyaangiban
     mikaw+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Prt+3PlProx+Excl: mikawisiwangidwaaban
     mikaw+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Prt+3PlProx+Excl: mikawiyangidwaaban
     mikaw+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Prt+3SgProx+Excl: mikawisiwangidiban
     mikaw+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Prt+3SgProx+Excl: mikawiyangidiban
     mikaw+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Prt+X+Excl: mikaagoosiwaangiban
     mikaw+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Prt+X+Excl: mikaagooyaangiban
     mikaw+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Dub+0Sg/0Pl+Incl: mikaagosiiwangen
     mikaw+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Dub+0Sg/0Pl+Incl: mikaagowangen
     mikaw+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Dub+3PlProx+Incl: mikoosiinowangwaawen
     mikaw+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Dub+3PlProx+Incl: mikoonowangwaawen
     mikaw+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Dub+3SgProx+Incl: mikoosiinowangen
     mikaw+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Dub+3SgProx+Incl: mikoonowangen
     mikaw+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Dub+X+Incl: mikaagoosiiwangen
     mikaw+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Dub+X+Incl: mikaagoowangen
     mikaw+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Neu+0Sg/0Pl+Incl: mikaagosiwang
     mikaw+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+0Sg/0Pl+Incl: mikaagoyang
     mikaw+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Neu+3PlProx+Incl: mikoosinowangwaa
     mikaw+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3PlProx+Incl: mikoonangwaa
     mikaw+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Neu+3SgProx+Incl: mikoosinowang
     mikaw+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3SgProx+Incl: mikoonang
     mikaw+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Neu+X+Incl: mikaagoosiwang
     mikaw+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+X+Incl: mikaagooyang
     mikaw+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Prt+0Sg/0Pl+Incl: mikaagosiwangiban
     mikaw+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Prt+0Sg/0Pl+Incl: mikaagoyangiban
     mikaw+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Prt+3PlProx+Incl: mikoosinowangwaaban
     mikaw+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Prt+3PlProx+Incl: mikoonangwaaban
     mikaw+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Prt+3SgProx+Incl: mikoosinowangiban
     mikaw+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Prt+3SgProx+Incl: mikoonangiban
     mikaw+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Prt+X+Incl: mikaagoosiwangiban
     mikaw+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Prt+X+Incl: mikaagooyangiban
